Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,111
Tax computation.

The taxes imposed by sections 66-6,107, 66-6,108, and 66-6,109 shall be computed by each retailer by multiplying the tax rate established in sections 66-6,107, 66-6,108, and 66-6,109 by the number of gallons or gallon equivalents of compressed fuel sold for use in registered motor vehicles.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 44;

Laws 2008, LB846, § 19.